Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2188.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 41, chapter 14, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-2023, to read: START_STATUTE41-2023. Language acquisition grant program A. THE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION GRANT PROGRAM IS ESTABLISHED CONSISTING OF MONIES APPROPRIATED BY THE LEGISLATURE TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO LISTENING AND SPOKEN LANGUAGE PROVIDERS that PROVIDE auditory verbal SERVICES TO EARLY INTERVENTION PROGRAMs and services ELIGIBLE INFANTS AND TODDLERS WHO ARE DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING.  MONIES IN THE FUND ARE SUBJECT TO LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATION. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE GRANT PROGRAM BY CONTRACTING WITH ELIGIBLE PROVIDERS AND MAY ADOPT RULES, POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION. B. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONTRACT WITH LISTENING AND SPOKEN LANGUAGE PROVIDERS IN THIS STATE TO PROVIDE auditory verbal SERVICES TO EARLY INTERVENTION PROGRAMs and services ELIGIBLE FAMILIES WITH INFANTS AND TODDLERS WHO ARE DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING. CONTRACTORS SHALL ENSURE THAT THE PROVIDED auditory verbal services ARE ADMINISTERED BY OR OVERSEEN BY A CERTIFIED EDUCATOR OR THERAPIST IN A NATURAL ENVIRONMENT, CLINICAL SETTING, EDUCATIONAL SETTING OR VIRTUALLY. C. THE EARLY INTERVENTION PROGRAMs and services SHALL REFER ELIGIBLE FAMILIES WITH CHILDREN WHO ARE IDENTIFIED AS DEAF OR HARD OF HEARING TO BOTH OF THE FOLLOWING, AT A MINIMUM: 1. QUALIFIED PROVIDERS WITHIN THE LANGUAGE ACQUISITION GRANT PROGRAM FOR LISTENING AND SPOKEN LANGUAGE auditory verbal SERVICES. 2. THE ARIZONA STATE SCHOOLS FOR THE DEAF AND THE BLIND for visual language education through american sign language AND ANY OTHER modalities OF communication available.END_STATUTE